Washington statutes.
RCW 18.20.525

Disaster preparedness plan.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5337-S2.SL) ***

(1) Each assisted living facility shall develop and maintain a comprehensive disaster preparedness plan to be followed in the event of a disaster or emergency, including fires, earthquakes, floods, infectious disease outbreaks, loss of power or water, and other events that may require sheltering in place, evacuations, or other emergency measures to protect the health and safety of residents. The facility shall review the comprehensive disaster preparedness plan annually, update the plan as needed, and train all employees when they begin work in the facility on the comprehensive disaster preparedness plan and related staff procedures.

(2) The department shall adopt rules governing the comprehensive disaster preparedness plan. At a minimum, the rules must address: Timely communication with the residents' emergency contacts; timely communication with state and local agencies, long-term care ombuds, and developmental disabilities ombuds; contacting and requesting emergency assistance; on-duty employees' responsibilities; meeting residents' essential needs; procedures to identify and locate residents; and procedures to provide emergency information to provide for the health and safety of residents. In addition, the rules shall establish standards for maintaining personal protective equipment and infection control capabilities, as well as department inspection procedures with respect to the plans.

[ 2021 c 159 s 5.]

NOTES:

Findings—2021 c 159: See note following RCW 18.20.520.